Utah statutes.
58-69-301.   License required -- License classifications -- Anesthesia and
analgesia permits.
(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of dentistry or dental
hygiene except as specifically provided in Section 58-69-306 or 58-1-307.
(2)  The division shall issue to individuals qualified under the provisions of
this chapter a license in the classification:
(a)  dentist; or
(b)  dental hygienist.
(3)  A permit is required to engage in administration of anesthesia or
analgesia in the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene.
(4)  The division in collaboration with the board shall establish by rule:
(a)  the classifications of anesthesia and analgesia permits and the scope of
practice permitted under each permit; and
(b)  the qualifications for each classification of anesthesia and analgesia
permit.
